Utah statutes.
48-2c-1002.   Timing of distributions.

Distributions to members shall be made at the times or upon the happening of the events specified in the operating agreement.  If the operating agreement does not otherwise provide, each current distribution shall be made to all members concurrently, or at other times determined by the members in a member-managed company, or by the managers in a manager-managed company.



Enacted by Chapter 260, 2001 General Session 

Repealed by Chapter 353, 2011 General Session

